Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.61.040

Defrauding a public utility in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of defrauding a public utility in the second degree if the utility service diverted or used exceeds five hundred dollars in value.

(2) Defrauding a public utility in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 1989 c 109 s 4.]